Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8221
Minimum data set, defined.

Minimum data set means a predetermined set of demographic and medical definitions set forth in the rules and regulations adopted under the Statewide Trauma System Act.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 21.